Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.160

Applicability of administrative procedure act provisions to commission action.

Actions taken by or on behalf of the commission shall be pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, or rules and regulations adopted in accordance therewith, and the right of judicial review provided by chapter 34.05 RCW shall be applicable to all such actions and rules and regulations.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 17.]